Hawaii statutes.
§431:15-310 Powers of liquidator. (a)
The liquidator shall have the power to:

(1) Appoint a special deputy to act for the
liquidator under this article, and to determine the special deputy's reasonable
compensation. The special deputy shall have all powers of the liquidator
granted by this section. The special deputy shall serve at the pleasure of the
liquidator;

(2) Employ employees and agents, legal counsel,
actuaries, accountants, appraisers, consultants, and such other personnel as
the liquidator deems necessary to assist in the liquidation;

(3) Fix the reasonable compensation of employees and
agents, legal counsel, actuaries, accountants, appraisers, and consultants with
the approval of the court;

(4) Pay reasonable compensation to persons appointed,
and defray from the funds or assets of the insurer all expenses of taking
possession of, conserving, conducting, liquidating, disposing of, or otherwise
dealing with the business and property of the insurer. If the property of the
insurer does not contain sufficient cash or liquid assets to defray the costs
incurred, the commissioner may advance the costs incurred out of any
appropriation for the maintenance of the insurance division. Any amounts
advanced for expenses of administration shall be repaid to the commissioner for
the use of the insurance division out of the first available moneys of the
insurer;

(5) Hold hearings, including but not limited to
hearings convened for the purpose of receiving testimony and evidence to
determine whether any assets of the insurer have been concealed,
misappropriated, or improperly transferred from the insurer. Prior to or at
any hearing convened by the liquidator, the liquidator may subpoena witnesses
to compel their attendance, administer oaths, examine any person under oath,
and compel any party to subscribe to their testimony after it has been
correctly reduced to writing, and in connection therewith require the
production of any books, papers, records, or other documents that the
liquidator deems relevant to the inquiry;

(6) Collect all debts and moneys due and claims
belonging to the insurer, wherever located, and for this purpose to:

(A) Institute timely action in other
jurisdictions, to forestall garnishment and attachment proceedings against such
debts;

(B) Do such other acts as are necessary or
expedient to collect, conserve, or protect its assets or property, including
the power to sell, compound, compromise, or assign debts for purposes of
collection upon such terms and conditions as the liquidator deems best; and

(C) Pursue any creditor's remedies available
to enforce the creditor's claims;

(7) Conduct public and private sales of the property
of the insurer;

(8) Use assets of the estate of an insurer under a
liquidation order to transfer policy obligations to a solvent assuming insurer,
if the transfer can be arranged without prejudice to applicable priorities
under section 431:15-332;

(9) Acquire, hypothecate, encumber, lease, improve,
sell, transfer, abandon, or otherwise dispose of or deal with, any property of
the insurer at its market value or upon such terms and conditions as are fair
and reasonable. The liquidator shall also have power to execute, acknowledge,
and deliver any and all deeds, assignments, releases, and other instruments
necessary or proper to effectuate any sale of property or other transaction in
connection with the liquidation;

(10) Borrow money on the security of the insurer's
assets, or without security, and to execute and deliver all documents necessary
to that transaction for the purpose of facilitating the liquidation;

(11) Enter into such contracts as are necessary to
carry out the order to liquidate, and affirm or disavow any contracts to which
the insurer is a party;

(12) Continue to prosecute and institute in the name
of the insurer or in the liquidator's own name any and all suits and other
legal proceedings in this State or elsewhere, and abandon the prosecution of
claims the liquidator deems unprofitable to pursue further. If the insurer is
dissolved under section 431:15-309, the liquidator shall have the power to
apply to any court in this State or elsewhere for leave to substitute the
liquidator for the insurer as plaintiff;

(13) Prosecute any action that may exist on behalf of
the creditors, members, policyholders, or shareholders of the insurer against
any officer of the insurer, or any other person;

(14) Remove any or all records and property of the
insurer to the offices of the commissioner or to another place that may be
convenient for the purposes of efficient and orderly execution of the
liquidation. Guaranty associations and foreign guaranty associations shall
have reasonable access to the records of the insurer as is necessary for them
to carry out their statutory obligations;

(15) Deposit in one or more banks in this State sums
that are required for meeting current administration expenses and dividend
distributions;

(16) Invest all sums not currently needed, unless the
court orders otherwise;

(17) File any necessary documents for recordation in
the bureau of conveyances or other appropriate office or elsewhere where
property of the insurer is located;

(18) Assert all defenses available to the insurer
against third persons, including statutes of limitations, statutes of frauds,
and the defense of usury. A waiver of any defense by the insurer after a
petition in liquidation has been filed shall not bind the liquidator. Whenever
a guaranty association or foreign guaranty association has an obligation to
defend any suit, the liquidator shall give precedence to the obligation and may
defend only in the absence of a defense by the guaranty associations;

(19) Exercise and enforce all the rights, remedies,
and powers of any creditor, shareholder, policyholder, or member, including any
power to avoid any transfer or lien that may be given by the general law and
that is not included with sections 431:15-315 to 431:15-317;

(20) Intervene in any proceeding wherever instituted
that might lead to the appointment of a receiver or trustee, and act as the receiver
or trustee whenever the appointment is offered;

(21) Enter into agreements with any receiver or
commissioner of any other state relating to the rehabilitation, liquidation,
conservation, or dissolution of an insurer doing business in both states; and

(22) Exercise all powers now held or hereafter
conferred upon receivers by the laws of this State not inconsistent with the
provisions of this article.

(b) The enumeration, in this section, of the
powers and authority of the liquidator shall not be construed as a limitation
upon the liquidator, nor shall it exclude in any manner the liquidator's right
to do such other acts not herein specifically enumerated, or otherwise provided
for, as may be necessary or appropriate for the accomplishment of or in aid of
the purpose of liquidation. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2004, c 122, §68; am
L 2005, c 132, §5]

Case Notes

Under §431:15-313 and this section, the commissioner has
exclusive standing under this article to assert claims arising out of the liquidation
or rehabilitation of an insurance company on behalf of not only the insolvent
insurer, but also its policyholders, creditors, and all other interested
parties. 89 H. 427, 974 P.2d 1017.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next